Vermont, session 2025-2026, S146.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. chapter 23 is added to read:
CHAPTER 23. EMPLOYER PROVIDED TRANSPORTATION DEMAND
MANAGEMENT PLAN
§ 1801. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Employee” has the same meaning as in section 341 of this title.
(2) “Employer” has the same meaning as in section 341 of this title.
(3) “Transportation demand management” or “TDM” means measures
that reduce vehicle miles traveled. Examples include telecommuting;
incentives to carpool, walk, bicycle, or ride public transit; and staggered work
shifts.
VT LEG #382265 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.146
2025 Page 2 of 3
(4) “Transportation management association” or “TMA” means a
nonprofit, member-controlled organization that provides transportation
services in a particular area, such as a region, municipality, commercial
district, mall, medical center, or industrial park, and an institutional framework
for transportation demand management.
§ 1802. TRANSPORTATION DEMAND MANAGEMENT PLAN
REQUIRED
(a) Adoption of a transportation demand management plan. Each employer
that has 50 or more employees performing services for it at a workplace in the
State shall design, adopt, and implement a TDM plan for that workplace that
includes measures to reduce vehicle miles traveled.
(b) Employer resources. All employers required to design, adopt, and
implement a TDM plan pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall consult
one or more of the following in developing and implementing a TDM plan and
other TDM measures:
(1) the Agency of Transportation’s Transportation Demand
Management (TDM) Guidance document, as updated;
(2) existing transportation management associations, including Go!
Vermont;
(3) mass transit authorities formed pursuant to 24 V.S.A. chapter 127;
(4) municipalities; and
VT LEG #382265 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.146
2025 Page 3 of 3
(5) municipal and regional planning commissions created pursuant to
24 V.S.A. chapter 117.
§ 1803. RULEMAKING
The Secretary of Transportation, in consultation with stakeholders, may
adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A chapter 25 to establish requirements for the
content of transportation demand management plans and to implement the
provisions of this section.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage, and employers that are required to
adopt and implement a transportation demand management plan pursuant to
this act shall do so not later than January 1, 2026.
VT LEG #382265 v.2